Maryland, session 2025, HB0048.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
5–405.
(a) A railroad company or its authorized agent may agree with the owner to
purchase, use, occupy, or divert the owner’s land, earth, gravel, stone, timber, streams,
materials, or improvements that the company wants for the proper construction or repair
of the railroad company’s roads or works.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0048*

HOUSE BILL 48
(b) The company may acquire the property by condemnation under Title 12 of the
Real Property Article if:
(1) the company cannot agree with the owner of the property; or
(2) an owner:
(i) is a minor, is adjudged to be mentally incompetent, or is under
any other legal disability to contract; or
(ii) is absent from the county in which the property is located when
the company wants the property.
5–406.
(a) (1) A railroad company may change the location or grade of any portion of
its road if the company finds the change is necessary for any reasonable cause, including to
avoid:
(i) inconvenience to public travel;
(ii) dangerous or difficult curves or grades; or
(iii) unsafe or unsubstantial grounds or foundations.
(2) A change of location or grade under this section shall follow the general
route of the existing road.
(3) A railroad company may enter on and take land and make surveys
necessary to make the change in location or grade in accordance with Title 12 of the Real
Property Article.
(b) (1) A railroad company is liable to the owner of the land on which the road
was constructed for any damages caused by a change in location or grade of the road.
(2) The amount of damages determined shall be paid to the owner or
deposited into court.
(3) An owner shall claim damages within:
(i) 30 days after actual notice of the intended change has been given
to the owner, if the owner resides on the premises; or
(ii) 60 days after publication of notice in a newspaper in general
circulation in the county, if the owner is a nonresident.

HOUSE BILL 48 3
(c) If a railroad company condemns land under this section, the condemnation is
binding on the company, unless the company chooses to abandon the location within 30
days after making the condemnation.
5–407.
(a) A railroad company and the municipal corporation, public officer, or public
authority that owns or has control of any road, street, alley, or other public way or ground
necessary to locate any part of the railroad may agree on the manner, terms, and conditions
allowing the railroad company to use or occupy the road, street, alley, or other public way
or ground.
(b) If the parties are unable to agree and the railroad company needs to use or
occupy the road, street, alley, or other public way or ground, the railroad company may
acquire the property by condemnation in accordance with Title 12 of the Real Property
Article.
(c) (1) A railroad company that lays track on any public street, road, alley, or
other public way or ground is responsible for any damage done by the location of the track
to private property on or near the public way or ground.
(2) The owner of the private property shall bring a civil action for damages
under this subsection within 2 years after the completion of the track.
(d) A railroad company may not pass through Baltimore City without the consent
of the Mayor and City Council.
5–408.
The power of a railroad company to condemn land and other property under this
subtitle includes the power to condemn, for railroad purposes, private crossings or ways
and land and other property to provide substitute outlets.
5–409.
(A) [Sections] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
§§ 5–405, 5–406, and 5–407 of this subtitle apply to all railroads operated by electricity,
cable, or other improved motive power, whether the property proposed to be condemned is
located in a county or Baltimore City, where streets and alleys have not been opened and
occupied as city streets.
(B) SECTIONS 5–405 THROUGH 5–408 OF THIS SUBTITLE DO NOT APPLY TO
AN ENTITY THAT OWNS OR OPERATES A RAILROAD POWERED BY A MAGNETIC
LEVITATION PROPULSION SYSTEM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect

HOUSE BILL 48
October 1, 2025.